Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-206
Effective time and date of document.

(MBCA 1.23) (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b) of this section and subsection (c) of section 21-207,
a document accepted for filing is effective:

(1) At the date and time
of filing, as evidenced by such means as the Secretary of State may use for
the purpose of recording the date and time of filing; or

(2) At the time specified
in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

(b) A document may specify
a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes
effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but
no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on
that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the
ninetieth day after the date it is filed.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 6.